Maine, session 132, LD2084.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §14501, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Director. "Director" means the Director of the Office of Professional and
Occupational Regulation within the Department of Professional and Financial Regulation.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §14513, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. KK, §10, is amended
to read:
§14513. Denial or refusal to renew license; disciplinary action
The board director may deny a license, refuse to renew a license or impose the
disciplinary sanctions authorized by Title 10, section 8003, subsection 5‑A for any of the
reasons enumerated in Title 10, section 8003, subsection 5‑A, paragraph A.
Page 1 - 132LR2817(03)

Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2817(03)